Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 16
FANTASY CONTESTS

Editor's note:

This part 16 was added with relocations in 2020. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this part 16, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

44-30-1601. Short title.

The short title of this part 16 is the "Fantasy Contests Act".

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1304, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-101 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1602. Applicability of common provisions.

Parts 1 and 3 of this article 30 apply, according to their terms, to this part 16 unless the context otherwise requires.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1305, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-102 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1603. Definitions.

As used in this part 16, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Confidential information" means information related to the play of a fantasy contest by fantasy contest players obtained as a result of or by virtue of a person's employment.

"Director" means the director of the division of gaming or the director's designee.

"Entry fee" means cash or cash equivalents that are required to be paid by a fantasy contest player to a fantasy contest operator in order to participate in a fantasy contest.

"Fantasy contest" means a fantasy or simulated game or contest in which:

The value of all prizes and awards offered to winning participants is established and made known to the participants in advance of the contest;

All winning outcomes reflect the relative knowledge and skill of the participants and are determined predominantly by accumulated statistical results of the performance of athletes in sporting events; and

Winning outcomes are not based on randomized or historical events or on the score, point spread, or any performance of any single actual sports team or combination of the teams or solely on any single performance of an individual athlete in any single actual sporting event.

"Fantasy contest operator" means a person or entity that offers fantasy contests with an entry fee for a cash prize to members of the public.

"Fantasy contest player" means a person who participates in a fantasy contest with an entry fee offered by a fantasy contest operator.

"Small fantasy contest operator" means a fantasy contest operator that has no more than seven thousand five hundred fantasy contest players in Colorado with active accounts who participate in fantasy contests with an entry fee.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1305, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-103 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1604. Rules.

The director of the division of gaming shall promulgate reasonable rules for the administration and enforcement of this part 16, including rules governing the identification, licensing, and fingerprinting of applicants for licensure.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1305, § 2, effective July 10.

44-30-1605. Registration.

On and after September 1, 2020, an entity shall not operate as a small fantasy contest operator unless the entity is registered with the director. On and after September 1, 2020, an individual who is not operating through an entity shall not operate as a small fantasy contest operator unless the individual is registered with the director.

A small fantasy contest operator is subject to all of the provisions of this part 16; except that:

A small fantasy contest operator need only be registered, not licensed, in order to offer fantasy contests for a fee, and a small fantasy operator is subject to section 44-30-1606 (3); and

The director shall:

Establish a registration process for small fantasy contest operators; and

Not initiate an investigation of a potential violation of this part 16 by a small fantasy contest operator except upon the filing of a complaint with the director that the director reasonably believes warrants investigation.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1306, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-105 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1606. Licensing - rules.

On and after September 1, 2020, an entity shall not operate as a fantasy contest operator unless the entity is licensed by the director. On and after September 1, 2020, an individual who is not operating through an entity shall not operate as a fantasy contest operator unless the individual is licensed as a fantasy contest operator by the director. Notwithstanding any provision of this part 16 to the contrary, the director shall issue a license to operate as a fantasy contest operator to any entity or individual that, as of August 30, 2020, held a valid license issued by the department of regulatory agencies to operate as a fantasy contest operator.

An applicant for licensure must pay license, renewal, and reinstatement fees established by the director consistent with section 44-30-203 and other authorities. The director may promulgate reasonable rules pertaining to the renewal, expiration, and reinstatement of licenses. The director shall transmit all fees collected to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the sports betting fund created in section 44-30-1509.

Applications for licensure as a fantasy contest operator must:

Be verified by the oath or affirmation of the person or persons as the director may prescribe;

Be made to the director on forms prepared and furnished by the director; and

Set forth such information as the director may require to enable the director to determine whether an applicant meets the requirements for licensure under this part 16. The information must include:

The name and address of the applicant;

If a partnership, the names and addresses of all of the partners, and if a corporation, association, or other organization, the names and addresses of the president, vice president, secretary, and managing officer, together with all other information deemed necessary by the director; and

A designation of the responsible party who is the agent for the licensee for all communications with the director.

An applicant may not be eligible for licensure or registration as a fantasy contest operator or licensure renewal if the applicant or any of its officers, directors, or general partners has been convicted of or has entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to a felony.

The director is governed by section 24-5-101 in considering the conviction or plea of nolo contendere to a felony for any individual subject to a record check pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

With the submission of an application for a license granted pursuant to this section, each applicant and its officers, directors, and general partners shall submit a complete set of the person's fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The director shall require a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d), for a person who has a record of arrest without a disposition. The director shall use the information resulting from the fingerprint-based criminal history record check or name-based judicial record check to investigate and determine whether an applicant is qualified to hold a license pursuant to this section. The director may verify the information an applicant is required to submit. The applicant shall pay the costs associated with the fingerprint-based criminal history record check to the Colorado bureau of investigation. The applicant is responsible for the costs associated with a name-based judicial record check.

A fantasy contest operator shall not conduct, operate, or offer a fantasy contest that:

Utilizes:

Video or mechanical reels or symbols or any other depictions of slot machines, poker, blackjack, craps, or roulette; or

Any device that qualifies as or replicates games that constitute limited gaming under section 9 of article XVIII of the Colorado constitution; or

Includes a high school or youth sporting event.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1307, § 2, effective July 10.

L. 2022:

(3)(b) and(4) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 536, § 61, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-106 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1607. Consumer protections.

A fantasy contest operator, including a small fantasy contest operator, shall implement commercially reasonable procedures for fantasy contests with an entry fee, which procedures are designed to:

Prevent employees of the fantasy contest operator, including a small fantasy contest operator, and relatives living in the same household as the employees, from competing in any fantasy contests offered by any fantasy contest operator in which the operator offers a cash prize; except that any of such individuals may play in a private contest on a fantasy contest platform in which the individual's relevant affiliation to the fantasy contest operator is disclosed to all other players;

Prevent sharing of confidential information that could affect the fantasy contest play with third parties until the information is made publicly available;

Verify that a fantasy contest player in such a fantasy contest is eighteen years of age or older;

Ensure that individuals who participate or officiate in a game or contest that is the subject of such a fantasy contest will be restricted from entering such a fantasy contest that is determined, in whole or in part, on the accumulated statistical results of a team of individuals in the game or contest in which they are a player or official;

Allow individuals to restrict themselves from entering such a fantasy contest upon request and provide reasonable steps to prevent the person from entering the fantasy contests offered by the fantasy contest operator, including a small fantasy contest operator;

Disclose the number of entries that a fantasy contest player may submit to each such fantasy contest, provide reasonable steps to prevent players from submitting more than the allowable number, and, in any contest involving at least one hundred one entries, not allow a player to submit more than the lesser of three percent of all entries or one hundred fifty entries;

Segregate fantasy contest player funds from operational funds and maintain a reserve in the form of cash, cash equivalents, an irrevocable letter of credit, a bond, or a combination thereof, in the amount of the deposits made to the accounts of fantasy contest players for the benefit and protection of the funds held in the accounts;

Distinguish highly experienced players and beginner players and ensure that highly experienced players are conspicuously identified as such to all players;

Prohibit the use of scripts in fantasy contests that give a player an unfair advantage over other players and make all authorized scripts readily available to all fantasy contest players;

Clearly and conspicuously disclose all rules that govern its contests, including the material terms of each promotional offer at the time the offer is advertised; and

Use technologically reasonable measures to limit each fantasy contest player to one active account with that operator.

A fantasy contest operator, including a small fantasy contest operator, offering fantasy contests in this state shall:

Contract with a third party to annually perform an independent audit, consistent with the standards established by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board, to ensure compliance with this part 16; and

Submit the results of the audit to the director.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1308, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-107 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1608. Duty to maintain records.

Each fantasy contest operator shall keep daily records of its operations and shall maintain the records for at least three years. The records must sufficiently detail all financial transactions to determine compliance with the requirements of this part 16 and must be available for audit and inspection by the director during the fantasy contest operator's regular business hours.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1310, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-108 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1609. Authorization to conduct fantasy contests.

Fantasy contests are authorized and may be conducted by a fantasy contest operator at a licensed gaming establishment. A gaming retailer may conduct fantasy contests if the gaming retailer is licensed as a fantasy contest operator.

Fantasy contests are authorized and may be conducted by a fantasy contest operator at a licensed facility at which pari-mutuel wagering, as defined in section 44-32-102 (18), may occur. An operator of a class B track, as defined in section 44-32-102 (3), may conduct fantasy contests if the operator is licensed as a fantasy contest operator.

A fantasy contest conducted in compliance with this part 16 does not violate article 10 or 10.5 of title 18.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1310, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-109 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1610. Grounds for discipline.

The director may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license or registration of or impose an administrative fine against a licensee or registrant if the fantasy contest operator, including a small fantasy contest operator:

Violates any order of the director, any provision of this part 16, or the rules established under this part 16;

Fails to meet the requirements for licensure under this part 16; or

Uses fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in applying for or attempting to apply for licensure or registration or otherwise in operating or offering to operate a fantasy contest.

If it appears to the director, based upon credible evidence as presented in a written complaint, that a person is operating or offering to operate a fantasy contest without having obtained a registration or license, the director may issue an order to cease and desist the activity. The director shall set forth in the order the statutes and rules alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all unauthorized practices immediately cease. Within ten days after service of the order to cease and desist pursuant to this subsection (2), the person may request a hearing on the question of whether acts or practices in violation of this part 16 have occurred. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to section 24-4-105 by the hearings division of the department in accordance with section 44-30-1613.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1310, § 2, effective July 10.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2875, § 6, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-110 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1611. Civil fines.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a fantasy contest operator, or an employee or agent thereof, who violates this part 16 is subject to a civil fine of not more than one thousand dollars for each such violation, which the state treasurer shall credit to the sports betting fund created in section 44-30-1509. The director may file a civil action to collect the fine.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1311, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-111 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1612. Applicability.

This part 16 applies to conduct occurring on or after September 1, 2020.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1311, § 2, effective July 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-125-112 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-30-1613. Hearings.

For the purposes of this part 16, administrative hearings shall be conducted by the hearings division of the department.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2875, § 7, effective August 10.